hr-HR: Održivost: Pravedna trgovina; Ručni rad; Odgovorno nabavljeno; Ostalo
pt-BR: Sustentabilidade: Feira comercial; Feito à mão; Origem responsável; Outro
en: Sustainability: Fair trade; Handcrafted; Responsibly sourced; Other
ro-RO: Durabilitate: Comerț echitabil; Lucrat manual; Provenit din surse durabile; Altele
nl: Duurzaamheid: Fair trade; Handgemaakt; Verantwoord ingekocht; Andere
sk-SK: Udržateľnosť: Fair trade; Ručne vyrobené; Zo zodpovedných zdrojov; Iné
da: Bæredygtighed: Fair Trade; Håndlavet; Ansvarligt indkøbt; Andet
el: Βιωσιμότητα: Δίκαιου εμπορίου; Χειροποίητο; Υπεύθυνη πηγή; Άλλο
pt-PT: Sustentabilidade: Comércio justo; Artesanal; De fonte responsável; Outro
fr: Durabilité: Commerce équitable; Fait main; Approvisionnement responsable; Autre
lt-LT: Tvarumas: Sąžininga prekyba; Rankų darbo; Atsakinga gavyba; Kita
cs: Udržitelnost: Fair trade; Ručně vyráběné; Zodpovědně získané; Jiné
tr: Sürdürülebilirlik: Adil ticaret; El yapımı; Sorumlu tedarik; Diğer
th: ความยั่งยืน: การค้าที่เป็นธรรม; ผลิตด้วยมือ; การจัดหาวัตถุดิบอย่างมีความรับผิดชอบ; อื่นๆ
vi: Tính bền vững: Thương mại công bằng; Làm thủ công; Có nguồn gốc có trách nhiệm; Khác
hu: Fenntarthatóság: Tisztességes kereskedelem; Kézzel készített; Felelősségteljes forrásból; Egyéb
ru: Устойчивость: Честная торговля; Ручная работа; Ответственное производство; Другое
zh-TW: 永續性: 公平貿易; 手工製作; 責任溯源; 其他
pl: Trwały i zrównoważony rozwój: Sprawiedliwy handel; Ręcznie wykonany; Odpowiedzialnie pozyskiwane; Inne
it: Sostenibilità: Commercio equo e solidale; Fatto a mano; Da fonti responsabili; Altro
ja: 持続可能性: フェアトレード; 手作り; 責任ある調達; その他
ko: 지속 가능성: 공정무역; 수공예; 책임감 있는 소싱; 기타
es: Sostenibilidad: Precio justo; Hecho a mano; Fuentes responsables; Otros
fi: Kestävyys: Reilu kauppa; Käsintehty; Vastuullisesti hankittu; Muu
nb: Bærekraft: Rettferdig handel; Håndlaget; Ansvarlig anskaffet; Annet
sl-SI: Trajnost: Pravična trgovina; Ročno izdelano; Odgovorno pridobljeno; Drugo
zh-CN: 可持续性: 公平贸易; 手工制作; 可靠来源; 其他
bg-BG: Устойчивост: Справедлива търговия; Ръчна изработка; Отговорен произход; Други
sv: Hållbarhet: Rättvis handel; Handgjord; Ansvarsfullt inköpt; Övrigt
de: Nachhaltigkeit: Fair Trade; Handgemacht; Verantwortungsvoll bezogen; Sonstiges